Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
PART 1 Duties of Trustee

53-12-240.
Duties generally.

The duties contained in this part are in addition to and not in limitation of the common law duties of the trustee, except to the extent inconsistent therewith.

Upon acceptance of a trusteeship, the trustee shall administer the trust in good faith, in accordance with its provisions and purposes.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-240

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Scope of Permissible Investments by Fiduciaries Under Georgia Law,” see 19 Ga. St. B.J. 6 (1982).

53-12-241.
Duty of prudent administration.

In administering a trust, the trustee shall exercise the judgment and care of a prudent person acting in a like capacity and familiar with such matters, considering the purposes, provisions, distribution requirements, and other circumstances of the trust.

A trustee who invests and manages trust assets owes a duty to the beneficiaries of the trust to comply with the prudent investor rule set forth in Article 16 of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-241

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-82/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, designated the previously existing provisions as subsection (a) and added subsection (b).

53-12-242.
Duty to inform as to existence of trust.

Within 60 days after the date of creation of an irrevocable trust or of the date on which a revocable trust becomes irrevocable, the trustee shall notify the qualified beneficiaries of such trust of the existence of such trust and the name and mailing address of such trustee.

All irrevocable trusts in existence on July 1, 2010, shall be deemed to have waived this provision unless the trust instrument says otherwise.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-242

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 18/HB 121.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2010, “in existence on July 1, 2010,” was substituted for “in existence on the effective date of this part” in subsection (b).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 219 (2018).

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

53-12-243.
Duty to provide reports and accounts.

On reasonable request by any qualified beneficiary, the trustee shall provide the qualified beneficiary with a report of information, to the extent relevant to that beneficiary’s interest, about the assets, liabilities, receipts, and disbursements of the trust, the acts of the trustee, and the particulars relating to the administration of such trust, including the trust provisions that describe or affect such beneficiary’s interest.

A trustee shall account at least annually, at the termination of the trust, and upon a change of trustees to each beneficiary of an irrevocable trust to whom income is required or authorized in the trustee’s discretion to be distributed currently, and to any person who may revoke the trust. At the termination of the trust, the trustee shall also account to each remainder beneficiary. Upon a change of trustees, the trustee shall also account to the successor trustee.

An accounting furnished to a beneficiary pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall contain a statement of receipts and disbursements of principal and income that have occurred during the last complete fiscal year of the trust or since the last accounting to that beneficiary and a statement of the assets and liabilities of the trust as of the end of the accounting period.

A trustee shall not be required to report information or account to a beneficiary who has waived in writing the right to a report or accounting and has not withdrawn that waiver.

Subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section and the common law duty of the trustee to keep the beneficiaries of the trust reasonably informed of the trust and its administration shall not apply to the extent that the provisions of the trust provide otherwise or the settlor of the trust directs otherwise in a writing delivered to the trustee.

Nothing in this Code section shall affect the power of a court to require or excuse an accounting.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-243

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131; Ga. L. 2018, p. 262, § 19/HB 121; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-83/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, deleted “qualified” preceding the first instance of “beneficiary” in paragraphs (b)(1) and (b)(2) and subsection (c); deleted the former last sentence in paragraph (b)(1), which read: “In full satisfaction of this obligation, the trustee may deliver the accounting to the guardian or conservator of any qualified beneficiary who is not sui juris.”; and, in subsection (d), inserted “and the common law duty of the trustee to keep the beneficiaries of the trust reasonably informed of the trust and its administration”, and substituted “provisions” for “terms”.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Scope of Permissible Investments by Fiduciaries Under Georgia Law,” see 19 Ga. St. B.J. 6 (1982).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 231 (2014).

For article on the 2018 amendment of this Code section, see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 219 (2018).

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).

53-12-244.
Duty to distribute income.

A trustee shall distribute all net income derived from the trust at least annually.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-244

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Scope of Permissible Investments by Fiduciaries Under Georgia Law,” see 19 Ga. St. B.J. 6 (1982).

53-12-245.
No duty to investigate resources.

A trustee shall not be under any duty to investigate the resources of any beneficiary when determining whether to distribute trust property to such beneficiary.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-245

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-246.
Duty to avoid conflict of interest.

A trustee shall administer the trust solely in the interests of the beneficiaries.

This Code section shall not preclude the following transactions, if fair to the beneficiaries:

An agreement between a trustee and a beneficiary relating to the appointment or compensation of the trustee;

Payment of reasonable compensation to the trustee; or

Performing and receiving reasonable compensation for performing services of a managerial, executive, or business advisory nature for a corporation or other business enterprise, where the trust estate owns an interest in the corporation or other business enterprise.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-246

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-247.
Duty of impartiality.

Except to the extent that the governing trust instrument clearly manifests an intention that the trustee shall or may favor one or more of the beneficiaries, a trustee shall administer a trust impartially based on what is fair and reasonable to all of the beneficiaries and with due regard to the respective interests of income beneficiaries and remainder beneficiaries.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-247

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.